District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Community Schools Grant Program Temporary Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 403(i)(2) of the Community Schools Incentive Act of 2012, effective June
19, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-754.03(i)(2), is amended by striking the
phrase “District residents” and inserting the word “individuals” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of having taken effect.